apertium-ca-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="fuori/uscire__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscii</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscivate</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciste</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscivi</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscisti</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciron</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirono</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciremmo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscì</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>escano</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscisser</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirei</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciamo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esca</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscireste</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciresti</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirebber</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>escono</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirebbero</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscite</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirebbe</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esce</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciremo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciti</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscita</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscito</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscissimo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirò</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscissi</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirete</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciste</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirai</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscissi</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciran</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciranno</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscirà</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscivamo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscimmo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscivo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscissero</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscite</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscisse</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esci</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciamo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esca</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciate</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscivan</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esca</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscivano</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscendo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciva</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>escan</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>usciamo</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esco</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscite</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esci</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>uscir</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>escon</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uscire</l> 
        <r>uscire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="riuscire">
        <i>ri</i> 
        <par n="fuori/uscire__vblex" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="uscire">
        <par n="fuori/uscire__vblex" /> 
    </e>
